Idaho, session 2026, S1391.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 18-7108, Idaho Code, as added in Section 1 of
Senate Bill No. 1326, As Amended, if enacted by the Second Regular Session
of the Sixty-eighth Idaho Legislature, be, and the same is hereby amended to
read as follows:
18-7108. SCOPE AND APPLICABILITY. Nothing in this chapter shall:
(1) Prevent government agents from conducting lawful investigations
from public vantage points or entering private land in response to exigent
circumstances;
(2) Prevent government agents from entering private land only to the
extent necessary to serve civil process or conduct welfare checks;
(3) Interfere with the use or administration of water rights as pro-
vided for in Idaho law;
(4) Interfere with the ability of the department of water resources, or
a designated watermaster, to make reasonable entry upon any lands to carry
out duties imposed by law;
(5) Interfere with the right of the owner or operator of any right-of-
way or easement for any ditch, canal, lateral, drain, or other conduit, as
described by law;
(6) Limit lawful aerial observation conducted in compliance with sec-
tion 21-213, Idaho Code;
(7) Limit lawful entry to control noxious weeds as authorized in sec-
tion 22-2406, Idaho Code;
(8) Limit lawful entry by abatement district employees as authorized in
section 39-2804, Idaho Code; or
(9) Limit lawful entry as authorized in sections 7-705, 40-1310,
40-2301, and 54-1230, Idaho Code; or
(9) (10) Increase or diminish any rights, protections, or legal au-
thorizations with respect to any place of habitation or the associated
curtilage.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after its
passage and approval.